Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-254
Accounts; filing; production at town meeting.

The accounts so audited, and those rejected, if any, shall be delivered with the certificates of the auditors, or a majority of them, to the town clerk, to be by him kept on file for the inspection of all persons. They shall also be produced by the town clerk at the next annual town meeting, and shall be there publicly read by him.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 53, p. 145;

R.S.1913, § 1038;

C.S.1922, § 940;

C.S.1929, § 26-254;

R.S.1943, § 23-254.